Utah statutes.
16-10a-822.   Notice of meeting.

(1)  Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or this chapter provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purposes of the meeting.

(2)  Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting.  The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

